Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-306
Act; enforcement.

The department, upon the recommendation of the Board of Pharmacy, the Board of Optometry, or the Board of Medicine and Surgery, shall notify the Attorney General of any possible violations of the Mail Order Contact Lens Act. If the Attorney General has reason to believe that an out-of-state person is operating in violation of the act, the Attorney General may commence an action in the district court of Lancaster County to enjoin such person from further mailing, shipping, or otherwise delivering contact lenses into Nebraska.

Laws 2001, LB 398, § 91.